Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.477, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Program established. The commissioner of public safety shall award a grant to the Minnesota Firefighter Initiative to administer a hometown heroes assistance program for Minnesota firefighters. The Minnesota Firefighter Initiative shall use the grant funds: (1) to establish and fund critical illness coverage that provides monetary support payments to each firefighter who is diagnosed with a critical illness on or after August 1, 2021, and who applies for the payment. Monetary support shall be provided according to the requirements in subdivision 3; (2) to develop a psychotherapy program customized to address emotional trauma experienced by firefightersnew text begin , which includes providing peer-to-peer support,new text end and to offer all firefighters in the state up to five psychotherapy sessions per year under the customized program, provided by mental health professionals; (3) to coordinate additional psychotherapy sessions to firefighters who need them; (4) to develop, deleted text begin annuallydeleted text end update, and annually deleted text begin providedeleted text end new text begin make availablenew text end to all firefighters in the state at least two hours of training on critical illnesses, such as cancer and heart disease, and emotional trauma as causes of illness and death for firefighters; steps and best practices for firefighters to limit the occupational risks of cancer, heart disease, and emotional trauma; provide evidence-based suicide prevention strategies; and ways for firefighters to address occupation-related emotional trauma and promote emotional wellness. The training shall be presented by firefighters who attend an additional course to prepare them to serve as trainers; and (5) for administrative and overhead costs of the Minnesota Firefighter Initiative associated with conducting the activities in clauses (1) to (4). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end